Arkansas, session 2025, HB1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1702(a), concerning the requirement
that each public school and public school district establish a parental
involvement plan, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Each public school district and each public school within its
boundaries, in collaboration with parents, shall establish a parental
involvement plan within its school-level improvement plan required under § 6-
15-2914, including programs and practices that enhance parent and family
engagement and reflect the specific needs of students and their families.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2904 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-2904. Responsibility of Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall develop and
*TNL326*
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
implement a comprehensive accountability system for Arkansas public schools
and school districts that:
(1) Establishes clear academic standards that are periodically
reviewed and revised;
(2) Maintains a statewide student assessment system that
includes a variety of assessment measures;
(3) Assesses whether all students have equitable access to
excellent educators;
(4) Establishes levels of support for public school districts;
and
(5) Maintains information systems composed of performance
indicators that allow the division to identify levels of public school
district support and generate reports for the public.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2914 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-2914. School-level improvement plans — School district support
plans.
(a) The General Assembly finds that it is the responsibility of:
(1) The state and educational service cooperatives to support
its their public school districts; and
(2) A public school district to support its schools.
(b)(1)(A) Beginning on May 1, 2018, and by By May 1 annually
thereafter of each school year, a public school shall submit to its public
school district a school-level improvement plan for approval by the public
school district and public school district board of directors for
implementation in the following school year.
(B)(i) A public school district and an open-enrollment
public charter school shall include a literacy plan in the annual school-
level improvement plan required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section.
(ii) The literacy plan required under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall include without limitation a curriculum
program and a professional development program that are:
(a) Aligned with the literacy needs of the
public school district; and
(b) Based on the science of reading as defined
by § 6-17-429(k)(1) § 6-17-429.
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
(C) A public school and an open-enrollment public charter
school shall include a parental involvement plan, as required under § 6-15-
1702, in its annual school-level improvement plan required under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section.
(2) School-level improvement plans shall be posted on the public
school district's school's or open-enrollment public charter school's website
by August 1 of each year.
(c) School-level improvement plans shall be:
(1) Monitored by the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school for implementation fidelity and progress throughout the
year; and
(2) Evaluated annually by the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school for goal progress and accomplishment.
(d)(1) Annually by September 1, a public school district receiving
Level 2 — Collaborative, Level 3 — Coordinated, Level 4 — Directed, or Level
5 — Intensive support shall submit to the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education a public school district support plan in accordance with
rules of the State Board of Education.
(2) A public school district's support plan shall be posted on
the public school district's website no later than ten (10) days after
submission to the division.
(3)(A) A public school district in which forty percent (40%) or
more of the public school district's students scored “in need of support” on
the state's prior year summative assessment for reading shall develop a
literacy plan as part of the public school district support plan required
under this section.
(B) The public school district literacy plan shall
include:
(i) Goals for improving reading achievement
throughout the public school district; and
(ii) Information regarding the prioritization of
funding, including without limitation Enhanced Student Achievement Funding
received under § 6-20-2305, for strategies to improve reading achievement
throughout the public school district.
(e) Public school district support plans shall include without
limitation the support the public school district will provide to public
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
schools identified as in need of targeted or comprehensive support, or both,
pursuant to the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No.
89-10, as reauthorized by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No.
114-95.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 15, Subchapter 29, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-15-2919. District strategic plans — Unified application system.
(a) Annually by June 30, each public school district and open-
enrollment public charter school shall submit a district strategic plan to
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for review for the
upcoming school year.
(b) A district strategic plan required by subsection (a) of this
section shall include without limitation:
(1) A literacy and mathematics plan that addresses student
supports and acceleration opportunities based on student data and outcomes;
(2) Information regarding the prioritization and intended use of
funding, including without limitation Enhanced Student Achievement Funding
received under § 6-20-2305; and
(3) The support the public school district and open-enrollment
public charter school will provide to public schools within the public school
district or the open-enrollment public charter school identified as in need
of targeted or comprehensive support, or both, pursuant to the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-10, as reauthorized by the
Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(c)(1) An educational service cooperative shall annually review and
monitor the implementation of a district strategic plan for each public
school district and open-enrollment public charter school that is a member of
the educational service cooperative.
(2) The division shall collaborate with each educational service
cooperative to annually review each district strategic plan and approve the
proposed use of funding.
(d) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall post its approved district strategic plan on its website by
October 1 of each year.
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
(e)(1) To promote efficiency, eliminate duplication, and assist public
school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools in implementing
district strategic plans, the division shall create a unified application
system that includes required state plans and federal funding applications.
(2) The unified application system required under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section shall include without limitation the following program
components and applications:
(A) Federal title funds;
(B) The parent and family engagement plan required under §
6-15-1702;
(C) The health and wellness plan required under § 20-7-
135;
(D) Enhanced Student Achievement Funding requirements
under § 6-20-2305;
(E) Alternative learning environment funding requirements
under § 6-48-102; and
(F) Gifted and talented programs under § 6-42-109.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(C) and (D) are amended to
read as follows:
(C)(i)(a) A school district shall expend funds allocated
under this subdivision (b)(4) in accordance with the rules developed by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education to provide the following
supports and resources:
(1) If the school district meets the
teacher compensation requirements according to the minimum salary schedule
under § 6-17-2403 for teachers serving in positions required by the Standards
for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts without
using funds provided under this subdivision (b)(4):
(A) The hiring of additional
teachers for core academic subject areas, as identified in the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education Rules Governing the Arkansas Qualified
Teacher Requirements, that are not required by the Standards for
Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts;
(B) The enhancement of teacher
salaries for recruitment and retention purposes;
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
(C) Obtaining additional
compensation for teachers who assume identified leadership roles; or
(D) Additional compensation for
teachers who assume additional responsibilities that support student academic
achievement;
(2) Academic supports and interventions,
including without limitation curriculum specialists, facilitators, tutors,
dyslexia interventions, and Response to Intervention;
(3) Social, emotional, and behavioral
supports;
(4) Physical and mental health
resources, including without limitation personnel;
(5) Early intervention resources,
including without limitation prekindergarten programs, school tutoring
programs that take place before or after school, and early literacy
interventions; and
(6) Access to postsecondary
opportunities, including without limitation access to career coaches,
concurrent credit courses, college-entrance support, and career-readiness
support.
(b)(1) By July 1, 2022, each public school
district shall submit a three-year enhanced student achievement plan to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education describing the school
district's intended and implemented strategies to enhance student achievement
and how enhanced student achievement funds will be used to support the
strategies of the school district as permitted by this subdivision (b)(4) and
rules promulgated by the State Board of Education.
(2) A school district shall review
annually the school district's enhanced student achievement plan and shall
review the progress of the school district's enhanced student achievement
plan.
(3) The enhanced student achievement
plan of a school district shall be updated as necessary by the school
district, and amendments to the enhanced student achievement plan shall be
submitted annually to the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education with
the annual budget of the school district.
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
(4) The Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall monitor the implementation and progress of the
enhanced student achievement plan of a school district.
(5) A school district that does not
demonstrate progress toward the goals of the enhanced student achievement
plan of the school district for three (3) consecutive years may be subject to
one (1) or more of the following:
(A) Additional monitoring by the
Division of Secondary and Elementary Education;
(B) An increased level of support
as provided in § 6-15-2913; or
(C) A corrective action plan that
shall be developed in collaboration with the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(c) The list of approved programs established
before July 24, 2019, by the State Board of Education under subdivision
(b)(4)(C)(i)(a) of this section shall expire on June 30, 2022.
(d)(b) The State Board of Education shall
promulgate rules for the implementation of this subdivision (b)(4)(C)(i) that
shall include without limitation:
(1) The process for submitting an
enhanced student achievement plan;
(2) The process for monitoring the
expenditure of funds allocated under this subdivision (b)(4); and
(3) The specific requirements,
qualifications, and criteria for allowable supports and resources.
(ii)(a) A school district shall budget one hundred
percent (100%) of funds allocated under this subdivision (b)(4) each year to
provide the supports and resources described in subdivision (b)(4)(C)(i)(a)
of this section.
(b) If a school district intends to transfer
funds allocated under this subdivision (b)(4) to other programs, the school
district shall provide justification for the transfer of funds to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(iii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education determines that a school
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
district's expenditure of funds allocated under this subdivision (b)(4) would
result in the school district's losing funding under any federal law, then
the funds allocated to a school district under this subdivision (b)(4) may be
expended for other academic programs or salaries.
(iv) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education may direct that a school district expend available funds on
specified programs under subdivision (b)(4)(C)(i) of this section.
(v) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall develop appropriate forms for use by school districts to
comply with this subdivision (b)(4)(C) and the rules of the State Board of
Education.
(D)(i) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall provide a report on the progress of school districts in meeting plan
goals to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Education by October 1 of each odd-numbered year, beginning in 2023.
(ii) The report shall include information broken
down by category as described in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section on:
(a) How school districts are spending funds
provided under this subdivision (b)(4), including specific programs utilized
by school districts;
(b) The amount of funds transferred to another
categorical fund, including an explanation of why the funds were transferred;
and
(c) The analysis of student achievement data
evaluated in student achievement growth models as described in § 6-15-2908
shall be expanded to include the evaluation of the best estimates of
classroom, school, and school district effects on enhancing student
achievement, in addition to the examination of student progress based on
established value-added longitudinal calculations.
(iii) The report shall be included in the General
Assembly's biennial adequacy study to evaluate the adequacy of education in
the state.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 20-7-135(e), concerning nutrition and
physical activity standards in public schools, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Every school district shall:
03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326

HB1938
(1) Convene a school nutrition and physical activity advisory
committee that shall include members from school district governing boards,
school administrators, food service personnel, teacher organizations,
parents, students, and professional groups such as nurses and community
members to include health and wellness goals as part of the school district's
district strategic plan required under § 6-15-2919, that address:
(A)(1) Help raise Raising awareness of the importance of
nutrition and physical activity; and
(B)(2) Assist Assisting in the development of local policies
that address issues and goals, including but not limited to without
limitation the following:
(i)(A) Assisting with the implementation of nutrition and
physical activity standards developed by the school nutrition and physical
activity advisory committee with the approval of the division and the State
Board of Health;
(ii)(B) Integrating nutrition and physical activity into
the overall curriculum;
(iii)(C) Ensuring that professional development for staff
includes nutrition and physical activity issues;
(iv)(D) Ensuring that students receive nutrition education
and engage in healthful levels of vigorous physical activity; and
(v)(E) Improving the quality of physical education
curricula and increasing training of physical education teachers;
(vi) Enforcing existing physical education
requirements; and
(vii) Pursuing contracts that both encourage healthy
eating by students and reduce school dependence on profits from the sale of
foods of minimal nutritional value;
(2) Begin the implementation of standards developed by the Child
Health Advisory Committee with the approval of the division and the State
Board of Health; and
(3) Require that goals and objectives for nutrition and physical
activity be incorporated into the annual school planning and reporting
process.


03/21/2025 2:04:13 PM TNL326